en: Smoked beers, Smoked beer
xx: Rauchbier
de: Rauchbier
lt: Rūkytas alus

en: Christmas beers
da: juleøl
de: Weihnachtsbiere
es: Cervezas de Navidad
fr: Bières de Noël
hr: Božićna piva
it: Birre natalizie
nl: Kerstbieren

en: Craft beers
bg: Крафт бири
de: Craft Biere
es: Cervezas artesanales
fi: Artesaanioluet
fr: Bières artisanales
hr: Craft piva
hu: Kézműves sörök, Kraft sör
it: Birre artigianali
ja: クラフトビール
nl: Ambachtelijke bieren
pl: Piwa kraftowe, Piwo kraftowe, Piwa rzemieślnicze, Piwo rzemieślnicze
ro: Beri artizanale, Bere artizanală

en: Pure malt beers
fr: Bières pur malt

en: Pure malt blond beers
fr: Bières blondes pur malt

en: Flavored beers, Flavored beer
de: Aromatisierte Biere
es: Cervezas aromatizadas
fi: Maustetut oluet
fr: Bières aromatisées
hr: Aromatizirana piva
hu: Ízesített sörök
it: Birre aromatizzate, birre con aroma
lt: Aromatizuotas alus
nl: Gearomatiseerde bieren
pl: Piwa smakowe
ro: Beri aromatizate, Beri aromate, Bere aromatizata, Bere aromata, Bere aromată, Bere aromatizată

en: Artisanal spirits
de: Craft Spirituosen
es: Bebidas alcohólicas artesanas, Bebidas alcohólicas artesanales
fi: Artesaaniviinat
fr: Alcools artisanaux
hr: Zanatska žestoka pića
hu: Kézműves szezek, Kézműves alkoholos italok
it: Bevande alcoliche artigianali, Alcolici artigianali
nl: Ambachtelijke alcoholica
ro: Băuturi alcoolice artizanale, Bauturi alcoolice artizanale

en: Organic beers
de: Bio-Biere
es: Cervezas organicas
fi: luomuoluet
fr: Bières bio
hr: Organska piva
hu: Bio sörök
it: Birre biologiche, birre bio
lt: Ekologiškas alus
nl: Biologische bieren
pl: Piwa organiczne
ro: Beri bio, Bere bio

en: Amber beers, Amber ale
de: Amber ales
es: Cerveza ambar
fi: Amber oluet, Amber ale
fr: Bières ambrées
hr: Jantarna piva
it: Birre ambrate
lt: Gintarinis alus
nl: Amber bier
zh: 爱尔淡啤酒

en: Beers with fruits
de: Fruchtbiere
fi: hedelmäoluet
fr: Bieres aromatisées aux fruits, Bières avec des fruits, Bieres aux fruits
hr: Piva s voćem
hu: Gyümölcsös sörök
it: Birre alla frutta
lt: Alus su vaisiais
nl: Vruchtenbieren
pt: Cervejas com frutas
ro: Beri cu fructe, Bere cu fructe

en: Beers with chestnut
de: Biere mit Kastanien
es: Cervezas con castañas
fi: Kastanjalla maustetut oluet
fr: Bières à la chataigne
hr: Piva s kestenom
hu: Gesztenyés sörök
it: Birre alla castagna
lt: Alus su kaštainiais
nl: Kastanjebieren
pl: Piwa z kasztanami
ro: Beri cu castane

en: Beers with pear
de: Birnenbier
es: Cervezas de pera
fr: Bières à la poire
hr: Piva s kruškom
it: Birre alla pera
lt: Alus su kriaušėmis
nl: Peerbieren
pl: Piwa z gruszką
ro: Beri cu pară

en: Radler beers, radler
xx: Radler
hu: Radler sörök
lt: Radleris, Radler alus

en: Wheat beers, Wheat beer, White beer, White beers
xx: Witbier
da: Hvedeøl
de: Weißbier, Weizenbier
dk: Hvedeöl
es: Cerveza blanca
fi: Vehnäoluet
fr: Bières blanches, bière blanche
hu: Búzasörök, Búzasör
it: Birra bianca
ja: 小麦ビール, 白ビール
lt: Kvietinis alus
nl: Witbieren
no: Hveteöl
pl: Piwa pszeniczne, Piwo pszeniczne
ro: Beri nefiltrate, Bere nefiltrată, Bere nefiltrata
sv: Veteöl, Starköl
zh: 白啤酒, 小麦啤酒

en: Grodziskie beers, Grodziskie
xx: Grodziskie beers, Grodziskie

en: Regional beers
fr: Bières régionales
hu: Regionális sörök

en: Lagers, lager
xx: Lagers, Lager
bg: Светла бира
de: Lager
fi: Lagerit
he: לאגרים
hu: Lágerek, Láger sörök, Világos sörök
it: Birre chiare
lt: Lageras, Lageris
nl: Lagers, Lager
pl: Lagery

en: Dark lagers, Dunkel
xx: Dark lagers, Dunkel

en: Black beers
xx: Schwarzbier
de: Schwarzbier
es: Cervezas negras
fr: Bières noires
he: בירות שחורות, בירה שחורה
hu: Fekete sörök
it: Birre nere
nl: Donkere bieren

en: Bock beers
xx: Bock beers